Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,132
Sale of real estate; bids; acceptance; conveyance; form.

The sale shall be by sealed bids. The directors may reject any and all bids and readvertise, if in their judgment it is for the best interest of the district. Upon approval of the sale, by a two-thirds vote of the board of directors of the district, the president of the board of directors shall in the name of the irrigation or drainage district execute and deliver a deed or contract to the purchaser, which deed or contract shall be attested by the secretary, and the seal of the irrigation or drainage district shall be affixed thereto.

Laws 1921, c. 257, § 5, p. 871;

C.S.1922, § 2937;

C.S.1929, § 46-195;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,132;

Laws 1971, LB 653, § 4.